Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,115
Emergency bylaws; procedure for adoption.

(1) Unless the articles of organization provide otherwise, the board of directors may adopt bylaws to be effective only in an emergency described in subsection (4) of this section. The emergency bylaws may be amended or repealed by the members and may make all provisions necessary for managing the limited cooperative association during the emergency, including:

(a) Procedures for calling a meeting of the board of directors;

(b) Quorum requirements for the meeting; and

(c) Designation of additional or substitute directors.

(2) The regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws remain effective during the emergency. The emergency bylaws are not effective after the emergency ends.

(3) Action taken by the limited cooperative association in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws:

(a) Binds the limited cooperative association; and

(b) May not be used to impose liability on a director, officer, employee, or agent of the limited cooperative association.

(4) An emergency exists for purposes of this section if a quorum of the board of directors cannot readily be assembled because of a catastrophic event.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 115.